Washington statutes.
RCW 31.04.055

License—Director's duties.

(1) The director shall issue and deliver a license to the applicant to make loans in accordance with this chapter at the location specified in the application if, after investigation, the director finds that:

(a) The applicant has paid all required fees;

(b) The applicant has submitted a complete application in compliance with RCW 31.04.045;

(c) Neither the applicant nor its officers or principals have had a license issued under this section or any other section, in this state or another state, revoked or suspended within the last five years of the date of filing of the application;

(d) Neither the applicant nor any of its officers or principals have been convicted of a gross misdemeanor involving dishonesty or financial misconduct or a felony or a violation of the banking laws of this state or of the United States within seven years of the filing of an application;

(e) The financial responsibility, experience, character, and general fitness of the applicant are such as to command the confidence of the community and to warrant a belief that the business will be operated honestly, fairly, and efficiently within the purposes of this chapter; and

(f) Neither the applicant nor any of its principals have provided unlicensed residential mortgage loan modification services in this state in the five years prior to the filing of the present application.

(2) If the director does not find the conditions of subsection (1) of this section have been met, the director shall not issue the license. The director shall notify the applicant of the denial and return to the applicant the bond posted and the sum paid by the applicant as a license fee, retaining the investigation fee to cover the costs of investigating the application. The director shall approve or deny every application for license under this chapter within ninety days from the filing of a complete application with the fees and the approved bond.

[ 2010 c 35 s 4; 2001 c 81 s 5; 1994 c 92 s 163; 1991 c 208 s 6.]